District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0635.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Arena Safety Conformity Temporary Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. The Robert F. Kennedy Memorial Stadium and the District of Columbia National
Guard Armory Public Safety Act, effective November 3, 1977 (D.C. Law 2-37; D.C. Official
Code § 3-341 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 3a (D.C. Official Code § 3-342.01) is amended as follows:
(1) A new paragraph (1A) is added to read as follows:
“(1A) “Downtown Arena” means a sports and entertainment arena located at 601
F Street, N.W.”.
(2) A new paragraph (3) is added to read as follows:
“(3) “Southeast Arena” means a sports and entertainment arena located at 1100
Oak Drive, S.E.”.
(b) Section 4b (D.C. Official Code § 3-343.02) is amended as follows:
(1) New subsections (b-2) and (b-3) are added to read as follows:
“(b-2) Unless expressly authorized by the operator of the Downtown Arena, or its duly
authorized agents, no person shall at any time enter onto any portion of the playing surface
within the Downtown Arena.”.
“(b-3) Unless expressly authorized by the Washington Convention and Sports Authority,
the lessee or operator of the Southeast Arena, or their duly authorized agents, no person shall at
any time enter onto any portion of the playing surface within the Southeast Arena.”.
(2) Subsection (c) is amended to read as follows:
“(c) For the purposes of this section, the term “playing field” or “playing surface”, as
applicable, means the area encompassed by the seating facilities within the Robert F. Kennedy
Memorial Stadium, the Baseball Stadium, the Soccer Stadium, the Downtown Arena, or the
Southeast Arena, as such seating facilities may be arranged from time to time.”.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2